translate/lexd/v.lexd
LEXICON RuLemmasV
wêб:вращаться
wêбт:вращаться
wêбтоw:вращаться
wêбч:вращаться
wêзд:заставлять_плыть
wêзд:купать
wêздоw:заставлять_плыть
wêздоw:купать
wêздоw:очищать
wêздоw:переправлять
wêзд:очищать
wêзд:переправлять
wêз:заставлять_плыть
wêз:купать
wêз:очищать
wêз:переправлять
wêзҷ:заставлять_плыть
wêзҷ:купать
wêзҷ:очищать
wêзҷ:переправлять
wêп:вращаться
wêпт:вращаться
wêптоw:вращаться
wêпч:вращаться
wêрв:болтать
wêрвд:болтать
wêрвд:кипятить
wêрвдоw:болтать
wêрвдоw:кипятить
wêрв:кипятить
wêрвҷ:болтать
wêрвҷ:кипятить
wêх̌:лишаться
wêх̌:мерзнуть
wêх̌:оказываться
wêх̌:падать
wêх̌:появляться
wêх̌:проваливаться
wêх̌:рваться
wêх̌т:лишаться
wêх̌т:мерзнуть
wêх̌тоw:лишаться
wêх̌тоw:мерзнуть
wêх̌тоw:оказываться
wêх̌тоw:падать
wêх̌тоw:появляться
wêх̌тоw:проваливаться
wêх̌тоw:рваться
wêх̌т:оказываться
wêх̌т:падать
wêх̌т:появляться
wêх̌т:проваливаться
wêх̌т:рваться
wêх̌ч:лишаться
wêх̌ч:мерзнуть
wêх̌ч:оказываться
wêх̌ч:падать
wêх̌ч:появляться
wêх̌ч:проваливаться
wêх̌ч:рваться
wêғ:блеять
wêғд:блеять
wêғдоw:блеять
wêғҷ:блеять
wāздоw:плавать
wāзд:плавать
wāз:плавать
wāз:плевать
wāрêздоw:подстреливать
wāрêздоw:ударять
wāрêзд:подстреливать
wāрêзд:ударять
wāрêз:подстреливать
wāрêз:ударять
wāрêзҷ:подстреливать
wāрêзҷ:ударять
wāрв:кипеть
wāрв:шевелиться
wāф:выдумывать
wāф:ткать
wāш:отделять_солому
wāш:размахивать
wāштоw:отделять_солому
wāштоw:размахивать
wāшт:отделять_солому
wāшт:размахивать
wāшч:отделять_солому
wāшч:размахивать
wāғ:выть
wāғд:выть
wāғд:кричать
wāғдоw:кричать
wāғд:плакать_навзрыд
wāғ:кричать
wāғ:плакать_навзрыд
wāғҷ:выть
wāғҷ:кричать
wāғҷ:плакать_навзрыд
wарwêх̌:ворочать
wарwêх̌т:ворочать
wарwêх̌тоw:ворочать
wарwêх̌ч:ворочать
wарwарθ:возиться
wарwарθ:искать
wарwарθ:перевертываться
wарwарθ:привыкать
wарwарθт:возиться
wарwарθт:искать
wарwарθтоw:возиться
wарwарθтоw:искать
wарwарθтоw:перевертываться
wарwарθтоw:привыкать
wарwарθт:перевертываться
wарwарθт:привыкать
wарwарθч:возиться
wарwарθч:искать
wарwарθч:перевертываться
wарwарθч:привыкать
wарδāw:болтать
wарδāwд:болтать
wарδи:болтать
wарδид:болтать
wарδидоw:болтать
wарδу̊ȥд:очищать_абрикосы_от_косточек
wарδу̊ȥ:очищать_абрикосы_от_косточек
wарδу̊:болтать
wарδу̊д:болтать
wарδу̊ӡдоw:очищать
wарδу̊ӡдоw:очищать_абрикосы_от_косточек
wарδу̊ӡд:очищать
wарδу̊ӡд:очищать_абрикосы_от_косточек
wарδу̊ӡ:очищать
wарδу̊ӡ:очищать_абрикосы_от_косточек
wарδуδ:болтать
wарδуδҷ:болтать
wарδу:болтать
wарδуд:болтать
wарδӣwдоw:очищать
wарδӣwд:очищать
wарδӣw:очищать
wарδӣвдоw:очищать_абрикосы_от_косточек
wарδӣвд:очищать_абрикосы_от_косточек
wарδӣв:очищать_абрикосы_от_косточек
wарδӣр:развлекать
wарδӣртоw:развлекать
wарδӣрт:развлекать
wарδӣрч:развлекать
wарδӯйд:очищать
wарδӯй:очищать
wарδӯй:очищать_абрикосы_от_косточек
wарδӯйҷ:очищать
wарδӯйҷ:очищать_абрикосы_от_косточек
wарθāп:болтать
wарθāп:искать
wарθāпт:болтать
wарθāпт:искать
wарθāптоw:болтать
wарθāптоw:искать
wарθап:болтать
wарθап:искать
wарθапч:болтать
wарθапч:искать
wарвен:болтать
wарвен:кипятить
wарвен:печь
wарвент:болтать
wарвент:кипятить
wарвентоw:болтать
wарвентоw:кипятить
wарвентоw:печь
wарвент:печь
wарвенч:болтать
wарвенч:кипятить
wарвенч:печь
wаш:размахивать_руками
wаштоw:размахивать_руками
wашт:размахивать_руками
wашч:размахивать_руками
wағ:выть
wағд:выть
wағд:кричать
wағдоw:выть
wағдоw:кричать
wағдоw:плакать_навзрыд
wағд:плакать_навзрыд
wағ:кричать
wағ:плакать_навзрыд
wақ:петь
wақсен:вызывать_тошноту
wақсент:вызывать_тошноту
wақсентоw:вызывать_тошноту
wақсенч:вызывать_тошноту
wақтоw:петь
wақт:петь
wақч:петь
wеδ:вводить
wеδ:вставлять
wеδ:выступает_во_второй_части_сложноименных_глаголов
wеδ:готовить
wеδ:давать
wеδд:вводить
wеδд:вставлять
wеδд:выступает_во_второй_части_сложноименных_глаголов
wеδд:готовить
wеδд:давать
wеδд:доводить
wеδд:засевать
wеδд:класть
wеδдоw:вводить
wеδдоw:вставлять
wеδдоw:выступает_во_второй_части_сложноименных_глаголов
wеδдоw:готовить
wеδдоw:давать
wеδдоw:доводить
wеδдоw:засевать
wеδдоw:класть
wеδдоw:обвинять
wеδдоw:организовывать
wеδдоw:помещать
wеδдоw:снимать
wеδдоw:ставить_отметку
wеδдоw:стелить
wеδдоw:стрелять
wеδдоw:упоминать
wеδдоw:хватать
wеδд:обвинять
wеδ:доводить
wеδд:организовывать
wеδд:помещать
wеδд:снимать
wеδд:ставить_отметку
wеδд:стелить
wеδд:стрелять
wеδд:упоминать
wеδд:хватать
wеδ:засевать
wеδ:класть
wеδ:обвинять
wеδ:организовывать
wеδ:помещать
wеδ:снимать
wеδ:ставить_отметку
wеδ:стелить
wеδ:стрелять
wеδ:упоминать
wеδ:хватать
wеδҷ:вводить
wеδҷ:вставлять
wеδҷ:выступает_во_второй_части_сложноименных_глаголов
wеδҷ:готовить
wеδҷ:давать
wеδҷ:доводить
wеδҷ:засевать
wеδҷ:класть
wеδҷ:обвинять
wеδҷ:организовывать
wеδҷ:помещать
wеδҷ:снимать
wеδҷ:ставить_отметку
wеδҷ:стелить
wеδҷ:стрелять
wеδҷ:упоминать
wеδҷ:хватать
wзен:знать
wзент:знать
wзентоw:знать
wзенч:знать
wзу̊н:знать
wзу̊н:понимать
wзу̊н:сделать_чтол
wзу̊н:считать
wзу̊нт:знать
wзу̊нт:понимать
wзу̊нт:сделать_чтол
wзу̊нт:считать
wзу̊нт:уважать
wзу̊нт:узнавать
wзу̊н:уважать
wзу̊н:узнавать
wиȥêр:разбрасывать_навоз
wиȥêрт:разбрасывать_навоз
wиȥид:освобождать
wиȥин:освобождать
wиȥи:освобождать
wиδ:вводить
wиδ:вставлять
wиδ:выступает_во_второй_части_сложноименных_глаголов
wиδ:готовить
wиδ:давать
wиδд:вводить
wиδд:вставлять
wиδд:выступает_во_второй_части_сложноименных_глаголов
wиδд:готовить
wиδд:давать
wиδд:доводить
wиδд:засевать
wиδд:класть
wиδд:обвинять
wиδ:доводить
wиδд:организовывать
wиδд:помещать
wиδд:снимать
wиδд:ставить_отметку
wиδд:стелить
wиδд:стрелять
wиδд:упоминать
wиδд:хватать
wиδ:засевать
wиδир:держаться
wиδирт:держаться
wиδиртоw:держаться
wиδирч:держаться
wиδ:класть
wиδ:обвинять
wиδ:организовывать
wиδ:помещать
wиδ:снимать
wиδ:ставить_отметку
wиδ:стелить
wиδ:стрелять
wиδу̊ȥ:обдирать
wиδу̊ȥ:терзать
wиδу̊ȥ:щипать
wиδу̊здоw:обдирать
wиδу̊здоw:терзать
wиδу̊здоw:щипать
wиδу̊зд:обдирать
wиδу̊зд:терзать
wиδу̊зд:щипать
wиδу̊з:обдирать
wиδу̊з:терзать
wиδу̊з:щипать
wиδу̊ӡд:расщеплять
wиδу̊ӡд:теребить
wиδу̊ӡд:терзать
wиδу̊ӡ:расщеплять
wиδу̊ӡ:теребить
wиδу̊ӡ:терзать
wиδ:упоминать
wиδ:хватать
wиδӣwдоw:обдирать
wиδӣwдоw:расщеплять
wиδӣwдоw:теребить
wиδӣwдоw:терзать
wиδӣwдоw:щипать
wиδӣwд:обдирать
wиδӣwд:расщеплять
wиδӣwд:теребить
wиδӣwд:терзать
wиδӣwд:щипать
wиδӣw:обдирать
wиδӣw:расщеплять
wиδӣw:теребить
wиδӣw:терзать
wиδӣw:щипать
wиδӣзд:обдирать
wиδӣзд:терзать
wиδӣзд:щипать
wиδӣз:обдирать
wиδӣз:терзать
wиδӣз:щипать
wиδӯйд:обдирать
wиδӯйд:расщеплять
wиδӯйд:теребить
wиδӯйд:терзать
wиδӯйд:щипать
wиδӯй:обдирать
wиδӯй:расщеплять
wиδӯй:теребить
wиδӯй:терзать
wиδӯй:щипать
wиδӯйҷ:обдирать
wиδӯйҷ:расщеплять
wиδӯйҷ:теребить
wиδӯйҷ:терзать
wиδӯйҷ:щипать
wижāв:возвращаться
wижāвд:возвращаться
wижāвҷ:возвращаться
wижаф:возвращаться
wижафс:возвращаться
wижафст:возвращаться
wижафц:возвращаться
wижафцт:возвращаться
wижеб:возвращать
wижебт:возвращать
wижеп:возвращать
wижепт:возвращать
wиживц:возвращаться
wижифс:возвращаться
wижифст:возвращаться
wижифц:возвращаться
wижифцт:возвращаться
wижӣв:возвращать
wижӣв:возвращаться
wижӣвд:возвращать
wижӣвд:возвращаться
wижӣвдоw:возвращать
wижӣвдоw:возвращаться
wижӣвҷ:возвращать
wижӣвҷ:возвращаться
wижӣвӡ:возвращаться
wизêw:гасить
wизêwд:гасить
wизêwдоw:тушить
wизêwд:тушить
wизêwт:тушить
wизêw:тушить
wизêwҷ:тушить
wизāw:гаснуть
wизаδ:гаснуть
wизаδҷ:гаснуть
wиза:гаснуть
wизад:гаснуть
wиздоw:помещаться
wизд:помещаться
wизен:знать
wизен:понимать
wизен:сделать_чтол
wизен:считать
wизент:знать
wизентоw:знать
wизентоw:понимать
wизентоw:сделать_чтол
wизентоw:считать
wизентоw:уважать
wизентоw:узнавать
wизент:понимать
wизент:сделать_чтол
wизент:считать
wизент:уважать
wизент:узнавать
wизен:уважать
wизен:узнавать
wизенч:знать
wизенч:понимать
wизенч:сделать_чтол
wизенч:считать
wизенч:уважать
wизенч:узнавать
wизи:гасить
wизи:гаснуть
wизид:гасить
wизид:гаснуть
wизидоw:гасить
wизидоw:гаснуть
wизидоw:тушить
wизид:тушить
wизи:тушить
wизиц:гаснуть
wизоδ:гаснуть
wизоδҷ:гаснуть
wиз:помещаться
wизу̊:гаснуть
wизу̊д:гаснуть
wизу̊н:знать
wизу̊н:понимать
wизу̊н:предполагать
wизу̊н:сделать_чтол
wизу̊н:считать
wизу̊нт:знать
wизу̊нтоw:предполагать
wизу̊нт:понимать
wизу̊нт:предполагать
wизу̊нт:сделать_чтол
wизу̊нт:считать
wизу̊нт:уважать
wизу̊нт:узнавать
wизу̊н:уважать
wизу̊н:узнавать
wизуδ:гасить
wизуδ:гаснуть
wизуδ:тушить
wизуδҷ:гасить
wизуδҷ:гаснуть
wизуδҷ:тушить
wизу:гасить
wизу:гаснуть
wизуд:гасить
wизуд:гаснуть
wизуд:тушить
wизу:тушить
wизҷ:помещаться
wизӯδ:гаснуть
wизӯδ:тушить
wизӯδҷ:гаснуть
wизӯδҷ:тушить
wикӣвд:кромсать
wикӣвд:перебирать
wикӣв:кромсать
wикӣв:перебирать
wилāмб:класть
wилāмбт:класть
wилāмбтоw:класть
wилāмбч:класть
wилāм:класть
wилāмт:класть
wилāмтоw:класть
wилāмч:класть
wиламб:класть
wиламбч:класть
wилам:класть
wиламч:класть
wин:видеть
wин:видеться
wирêздоw:справляться
wирêзд:справляться
wирêз:справляться
wирêзҷ:справляться
wирāфц:вставать
wирāфц:отставать
wиремб:заставлять_стоять
wиремб:заставлять_стоять_в_наказание
wиремб:ставить_на_отдых
wирембт:заставлять_стоять
wирембт:заставлять_стоять_в_наказание
wирембтоw:заставлять_стоять
wирембтоw:заставлять_стоять_в_наказание
wирембч:заставлять_стоять
wирембч:заставлять_стоять_в_наказание
wирем:заставлять_стоять
wирем:заставлять_стоять_в_наказание
wирем:ставить_на_отдых
wиремт:заставлять_стоять
wиремт:заставлять_стоять_в_наказание
wиремтоw:заставлять_стоять
wиремтоw:заставлять_стоять_в_наказание
wиремтоw:ставить_на_отдых
wиремт:ставить_на_отдых
wиремч:ставить_на_отдых
wиремҷ:заставлять_стоять
wиремҷ:заставлять_стоять_в_наказание
wирех̌:проникать
wирех̌:разрезать
wирех̌:распарывать
wирех̌тоw:проникать
wирех̌тоw:разрезать
wирех̌тоw:распарывать
wирех̌т:проникать
wирех̌т:разрезать
wирех̌т:распарывать
wирех̌ч:проникать
wирех̌ч:разрезать
wирех̌ч:распарывать
wиров:вставать
wировд:вставать
wировд:отставать
wиров:отставать
wировҷ:вставать
wировҷ:отставать
wиройд:расплетаться
wирой:расплетаться
wиройҷ:расплетаться
wирофс:вставать
wирофст:вставать
wирофц:вставать
wирофц:отставать
wирофцт:вставать
wирофцт:отставать
wиру̊ȥ:расплетать
wиру̊зд:расплетать
wиру̊з:расплетать
wиру̊ӡдоw:распарывать
wиру̊ӡд:распарывать
wиру̊ӡ:распарывать
wирӣwдоw:распарывать
wирӣwдоw:расплетать
wирӣwдоw:расплетаться
wирӣwд:распарывать
wирӣwд:расплетать
wирӣwд:расплетаться
wирӣw:распарывать
wирӣw:расплетать
wирӣw:расплетаться
wирӣwс:расплетаться
wирӣwстоw:расплетаться
wирӣwст:расплетаться
wирӣwӡ:расплетаться
wирӣвȥ:вставать
wирӣвȥ:отставать
wирӣв:вставать
wирӣвд:вставать
wирӣвдоw:вставать
wирӣвдоw:отставать
wирӣвд:отставать
wирӣв:отставать
wирӣвӡ:вставать
wирӯв:вставать
wирӯвд:вставать
wирӯвд:отставать
wирӯв:отставать
wирӯвҷ:вставать
wирӯвҷ:отставать
wирӯйд:распарывать
wирӯйд:расплетать
wирӯйд:расплетаться
wирӯй:распарывать
wирӯй:расплетать
wирӯй:расплетаться
wирӯйҷ:распарывать
wирӯйҷ:расплетать
wирӯйҷ:расплетаться
wих̌аw:расчесывать
wих̌аɣ̌:расчесывать
wих̌аɣ̌:чесать
wих̌ед:отпирать
wих̌е:отпирать
wих̌иδ:отпирать
wих̌иδҷ:отпирать
wих̌идоw:отпирать
wих̌ид:отпирать
wих̌и:отпирать
wих̌их̌:расчесывать
wих̌их̌тоw:расчесывать
wих̌их̌тоw:чесать
wих̌их̌т:расчесывать
wих̌их̌т:чесать
wих̌их̌:чесать
wих̌камб:кромсать
wих̌камб:перебирать
wих̌кӣвд:кромсать
wих̌кӣвдоw:кромсать
wих̌кӣвдоw:перебирать
wих̌кӣвд:перебирать
wих̌кӣв:кромсать
wих̌кӣв:перебирать
wих̌кӣм:кромсать
wих̌кӣм:перебирать
wих̌кӣмт:кромсать
wих̌кӣмт:перебирать
wих̌кӯвд:кромсать
wих̌кӯвд:перебирать
wих̌кӯв:кромсать
wих̌кӯв:перебирать
wих̌кӯвҷ:кромсать
wих̌кӯвҷ:перебирать
wих̌кӯд:кромсать
wих̌кӯд:перебирать
wих̌кӯ:кромсать
wих̌кӯ:перебирать
wих̌:отпирать
wих̌т:отпирать
wих̌уд:расчесывать
wих̌у:расчесывать
wих̌ух̌:расчесывать
wих̌ух̌т:чесать
wих̌ух̌:чесать
wих̌ух̌ч:расчесывать
wих̌ух̌ч:чесать
wих̌ӣɣ̌д:расчесывать
wих̌ӣɣ̌д:чесать
wих̌ӣɣ̌:расчесывать
wих̌ӣɣ̌:чесать
wих̌ӣδ:отпирать
wих̌ӣδҷ:отпирать
wихойтоw:ударять
wихойт:ударять
wихой:ударять
wихойч:ударять
wиш:мешать
wиш:работать_не_спеша
wишт:мешать
wиштоw:мешать
wиштоw:работать_не_спеша
wиштоw:хлопотать_за_когол
wишт:работать_не_спеша
wишт:хлопотать_за_когол
wиш:хлопотать_за_когол
wишч:мешать
wишч:работать_не_спеша
wишч:хлопотать_за_когол
wиӡêр:разбрасывать_навоз
wиӡêртоw:разбрасывать_навоз
wиӡêрт:разбрасывать_навоз
wиӡêрч:разбрасывать_навоз
wиӡдоw:помещаться
wиӡд:помещаться
wиӡер:разбрасывать_навоз
wиӡерч:разбрасывать_навоз
wиӡиδ:сметать
wиӡиδ:чистить
wиӡиδҷ:сметать
wиӡиδҷ:чистить
